viceverser/data/fr_ud.aff
FLAG long
SFX yZ Y 20
SFX yZ rire rire/ rire  is:infi
SFX yZ rire risant/ rire  is:ppre
SFX yZ rire rit/ rire  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX yZ rire rits/ rire  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX yZ rire rite/ rire  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX yZ rire rit·e/ rire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX yZ rire rites/ rire  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX yZ rire rit·es/ rire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX yZ rire ris/ rire  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX yZ rire rit/ rire  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX yZ rire rirai/ rire  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX yZ rire riras/ rire  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX yZ rire rira/ rire  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX yZ rire rirais/ rire  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX yZ rire rirait/ rire  is:cond is:3sg
SFX yZ rire ris/ rire  is:impe is:2sg
SFX yZ rire rit-e/ rire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX yZ rire rit-es/ rire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX yZ rire rit·e·s/ rire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX yZ rire rit-e-s/ rire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX q+ Y 90
SFX q+ enir enu/ enir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ enir enus/ enir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ enir enue/ enir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ enir enu·e/ enir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ enir enues/ enir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ enir enu·es/ enir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ tir ti/ tir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ tir tis/ tir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ tir tie/ tir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ tir ti·e/ tir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ tir ties/ tir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ tir ti·es/ tir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ courir couru/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ courir courus/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ courir courue/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ courir couru·e/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ courir courues/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ courir couru·es/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ ivre écu/ vivre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ ivre écus/ vivre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ ivre écue/ vivre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ ivre écu·e/ vivre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ ivre écues/ vivre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ ivre écu·es/ vivre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ aire u/ aire  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ aire us/ aire  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ aire ue/ aire  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ aire u·e/ aire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ aire ues/ aire  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ aire u·es/ aire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ dre du/ dre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ dre dus/ dre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ dre due/ dre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ dre du·e/ dre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ dre dues/ dre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ dre du·es/ dre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ valoir valu/ .valoir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ valoir valus/ .valoir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ valoir value/ .valoir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ valoir valu·e/ .valoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ valoir values/ .valoir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ valoir valu·es/ .valoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ aître u/ aître  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ aître us/ aître  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ aître ue/ aître  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ aître u·e/ aître  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ aître ues/ aître  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ aître u·es/ aître  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ aitre u/ aitre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ aitre us/ aitre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ aitre ue/ aitre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ aitre u·e/ aitre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ aitre ues/ aitre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ aitre u·es/ aitre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ enir enu-e/ enir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ enir enu-es/ enir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ tir ti-e/ tir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ tir ti-es/ tir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ courir couru-e/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ courir couru-es/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ ivre écu-e/ vivre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ ivre écu-es/ vivre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ aire u-e/ aire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ aire u-es/ aire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ dre du-e/ dre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ dre du-es/ dre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ valoir valu-e/ .valoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ valoir valu-es/ .valoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ aître u-e/ aître  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ aître u-es/ aître  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ aitre u-e/ aitre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX q+ aitre u-es/ aitre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ enir enu·e·s/ enir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ tir ti·e·s/ tir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ courir couru·e·s/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ ivre écu·e·s/ vivre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ aire u·e·s/ aire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ dre du·e·s/ dre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ valoir valu·e·s/ .valoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ aître u·e·s/ aître  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ aitre u·e·s/ aitre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ enir enu-e-s/ enir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ tir ti-e-s/ tir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ courir couru-e-s/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ ivre écu-e-s/ vivre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ aire u-e-s/ aire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ dre du-e-s/ dre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ valoir valu-e-s/ .valoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ aître u-e-s/ aître  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX q+ aitre u-e-s/ aitre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX q. Y 9
SFX q. enir enu/ enir  is:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. tir ti/ tir  is:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. courir couru/ courir  is:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. ivre écu/ vivre  is:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. aire u/ aire  is:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. dre du/ dre  is:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. valoir valu/ .valoir  is:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. aître u/ aître  is:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. aitre u/ aitre  is:ppas is:epi is:inv


NOCOMPOUNDSUGS

ONLYINCOMPOUND &i

COMPOUNDRULE 1
COMPOUNDRULE (&i)(&i)*(&e)?

# réveille-matin, mais pas "réveillons-matin"
COMPOUNDBEGIN &p
COMPOUNDMIDDLE &-
COMPOUNDEND &&

# "-"
COMPOUNDMIN 1
