viceverser/data/fr_ud.dic
abstenir/i0q+  po:verb
apparaitre/wQq+  po:verb
apparaître/wQq+  po:verb
circonvenir/i0q+  po:verb
comparaitre/wQq.  po:verb
comparaître/wQq.  po:verb
complaire/wNq.  po:verb
condescendre/tEq.  po:verb
connaitre/wQq+  po:verb
connaître/wQq+  po:verb
consentir/i5q+  po:verb
contenir/i0q+  po:verb
contrevenir/i0q+  po:verb
convenir/i0q+  po:verb
correspondre/tEq.  po:verb
démentir/i5q+  po:verb
démordre/tEq.  po:verb
départir/i5q+  po:verb
déplaire/wNq.  po:verb
détenir/i0q+  po:verb
devenir/i0q+  po:verb
disconvenir/i0q+  po:verb
disparaitre/wQq+  po:verb
disparaître/wQq+  po:verb
entretenir/i0q+  po:verb
équivaloir/pNq.  po:verb
frire/yZ  po:verb
intervenir/i0q+  po:verb
maintenir/i0q+  po:verb
méconnaitre/wQq+  po:verb
méconnaître/wQq+  po:verb
mentir/i5q.  po:verb
morfondre/tEq+  po:verb
obtenir/i0q+  po:verb
obvenir/i0q+  po:verb
paraitre/wQq+  po:verb
paraître/wQq+  po:verb
partir/i5q+  po:verb
parvenir/i0q+  po:verb
plaire/wNq.  po:verb
pressentir/i5q+  po:verb
prévaloir/pNq+  po:verb
prévenir/i0q+  po:verb
provenir/i0q+  po:verb
réapparaitre/wQq+  po:verb
réapparaître/wQq+  po:verb
recomparaitre/wQq.  po:verb
recomparaître/wQq.  po:verb
reconnaitre/wQq+  po:verb
reconnaître/wQq+  po:verb
redevenir/i0q+  po:verb
reparaitre/wQq+  po:verb
reparaître/wQq+  po:verb
repartir/i5q+  po:verb
repentir/i5q+  po:verb
ressentir/i5q+  po:verb
ressortir/i5q+  po:verb
ressouvenir/i0q+  po:verb
retenir/i0q+  po:verb
revenir/i0q+  po:verb
revivre/xSq+  po:verb
sentir/i5q+  po:verb
sortir/i5q+  po:verb
soutenir/i0q+  po:verb
souvenir/i0q+  po:verb
subvenir/i0q.  po:verb
survenir/i0q+  po:verb
survivre/xSq.  po:verb
taire/wNq+  po:verb
tenir/i0q+  po:verb
transparaitre/wQq.  po:verb
transparaître/wQq.  po:verb
venir/i0q+  po:verb
vivre/xSq+  po:verb
